Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5796.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 118a. (1) If an elected county officer is convicted of a felony, that county officer shall, not later than 3 business days after the date the county officer is convicted of a felony, update the affidavit that the county officer filed with the county clerk under section 558a of the Michigan election law, 1954 PA 116, MCL 168.558a, to indicate that the county officer was convicted of a felony. (2) As used in this section, "convicted of a felony" means a court has entered a judgment of conviction for a felony offense, regardless of whether sentencing has occurred or whether there is an appeal pending. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 5795 (request no. H05454'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.